Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB100.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2127 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 2127. Expenses.--The following expenses may be deducted from the value of the property transferred:(1) Administration expenses. All reasonable expenses of administration of the decedent's estate and of the assets includable in the decedent's taxable estate are deductible.(2) Bequest to fiduciary or attorney in lieu of fees. A transfer to an executor, trustee or attorney in lieu of 12345678910111213141516171819202122 compensation for services is deductible to the extent it does not exceed reasonable compensation for the services to be performed.(3) Family exemption. The family exemption is deductible. For purposes of this article, a family exemption not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may be deducted from the value of the property transferred if the exemption is claimed by a member of the same family.(4) Funeral and burial expenses. Reasonable and customary funeral expenses, including the cost of a family burial lot or other resting place, are deductible.(5) Tombstones and gravemarkers. Reasonable and customary expenses for the purchase and erection of a monument, gravestone or marker on decedent's burial lot or final resting place are deductible.(6) Burial trusts or contracts. Bequests or devises in trust, or funds placed in trust after decedent's death or funds paid under a contract after decedent's death, in reasonable amounts, to the extent that the funds or income from the funds is to be applied to the care and preservation of the family burial lot or other final resting place in which the decedent is buried or the remains of the decedent repose and the structure on the burial lot or other final resting place, are deductible.(7) Bequests for religious services. Bequests in reasonable amounts for the performance or celebration of religious rites, rituals, services or ceremonies, in consequence of the death of the decedent, shall be deductible.Section 2. The amendment of section 2127 of the act shall apply to the value of property transferred after June 30, 2024.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0100PN0776 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930